North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 2. Work First Program.
§ 108A-27.9.
State Plan.

The Department shall prepare and submit to the Director of the Budget a biennial State Plan that proposes the goals and requirements for the State and the terms of the Work First Program for each fiscal year. Prior to submitting a State Plan to the General Assembly, the Department shall:

Consult with local government and private sector organizations regarding the design of the State Plan and allow 45 days to receive comments from those organizations; and

Upon complying with subdivision (1) of this subsection, submit the State Plan to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services for review.

The State Plan shall consist of generally applicable provisions and two separate sections, one proposing the terms of the Work First Program in Electing Counties, and the other proposing the terms for the Standard Work First Program.

The State Plan shall include the following generally applicable provisions:

Provisions to ensure that recipients who are sanctioned are provided a clear explanation of the sanction and that all recipients, including those under sanction or termination for rules infractions, are fully informed of their right to legal counsel and any other representatives they choose at their own cost;

(1a)

Provisions to ensure that no Work First Program recipients, required to participate in work activities, shall be employed or assigned when:

Any regular employee is on layoff from the same or substantially equivalent job;

An employer terminates any regular employee or otherwise causes an involuntary reduction in the employer’s workforce in order to hire Work First recipients; or

An employer otherwise causes the displacement of any currently employed worker or positions, including partial displacements such as reductions in hours of nonovertime work, wages, or employment benefits, in order to hire Work First recipients;

(1b)

Reserved for future codification purposes.

(1c)

Provisions to ensure that all work eligible parents and all parents with a child under 12 months of age are subject to pay for performance requirements. Pay for performance requirements means that the family will receive Work First benefits in the month following a month that they comply with their Mutual Responsibility Agreement. Failure to comply with the Mutual Responsibility Agreement without good cause will result in no Work First benefits in the following month.

Provisions to ensure the establishment and maintenance of grievance procedures to resolve complaints by regular employees who allege that the employment or assignment of a Work First Program recipient is in violation of subdivision (1a) of this subsection, and grievance procedures to resolve complaints by Work First Participants made pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection;

Provisions to ensure that Work First Program participants, required to participate in work activities, shall be subject to and have the Work First Program employees in similarly situated work activities, including, but not limited to, wage and hour laws, health and safety standards, and nondiscrimination laws, provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit Work First Program participants from receiving additional State or county services designed to assist Work First Program participants achieve job stability and self-sufficiency;

A description of eligible federal and State work activities. For up to twenty percent (20%) of Work First recipients, authorized State work activities shall include at least part-time enrollment in a postsecondary education program. In Standard Counties, recipients enrolled on at least a part-time basis in a postsecondary education program and maintaining a 2.5 grade point average or its equivalent shall have their two-year time limit suspended for up to three years.

Requirements for assignment of child support income and compliance with child support activities;

Incentives for high-performing counties, contingency plans for counties unable to meet financial commitments during the term of the State Plan, and sanctions against counties failing to meet performance expectations, including allocation of any federal penalties that may be assessed against the State as a result of a county’s failure to perform; and

Anything else required by federal or State law, rule, or regulation to be included in the State Plan.

The section of the State Plan proposing the terms of the Work First Program in Electing Counties shall be based upon the aggregate of the Electing County Plans and shall include federal eligibility requirements and a description of the eligibility requirements and benefit calculation in each Electing County.The Department may modify the section in the State Plan regarding Electing Counties once a biennium or except as necessary to reflect any modifications made by an Electing County. Any changes to the section of the State Plan regarding Electing Counties shall be reported to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division within one month following the changes.

The section of the State Plan describing the Standard Work First Program shall include:

Benefit levels, limitations, and payments and the method for calculating benefit levels and payments;

Eligibility criteria, including asset and income standards;

Any exceptions or exemptions proposed to work requirements;

Provisions for when extensions may be granted to a person or family who reaches the time limit for receipt of benefits;

Provisions for exceptions and exemptions to criteria, time limits, and standards;

Provisions for sanctions for recipient failure to comply with program requirements; and

through (10) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 7, effective August 26, 2009.

(11)

A description of the Department’s consultation with local governments and private sector organizations and a summary of any comments received during the 45-day public comment period.

In addition to those items required to be included pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, the State Plan may include proposals to establish the following as part of the Standard Work First Program:

Demonstration projects in one or more counties to assess the value of any proposed changes in State policy or to test ways to improve programs; and

Requirement that recipients shall be required to enter into and comply with Mutual Responsibility Agreements as a condition of receiving benefits. If provided for in the State Plan, the terms and conditions of Mutual Responsibility Agreements shall be consistent with program purposes, federal law, and availability of funds.

The State Plan may provide for automatic Medicaid eligibility for all Work First Program recipients.

The State Plan may provide that in cases where benefits are paid only for a child, the case is considered a family case.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 1997-456, s. 55.10; 1998-212, s. 12.27A(b), (b1); 1999-359, ss. 1.2(b), 2(c); 2001-424, s. 21.13(c), (e); 2007-323, s. 10.35A(a); 2009-489, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 10.35A(a), effective July 1, 2007, in subsection (a), deleted “submit the State Plan to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services for its review and then consult with local governments and private sector organizations regarding the design of the State Plan and allow 45 days to receive comments from them” following “shall” at the end of the introductory paragraph and added subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2).

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 10, effective August 26, 2009, rewrote subdivision (c)(1c); rewrote subsection (d); deleted subdivisions (e)(7)-(10) pertaining to the inclusion of terms and conditions for repayment and funding levels and allocation in the section of the State Plan describing the Standard Work First Program; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 108A-27.10.
Duties of the Director of the Budget/Governor.

The Director of the Budget shall, by May 15 of each odd-numbered year, approve and recommend adoption by the General Assembly of the State Plan.

At the beginning of every fiscal year, the Director of the Budget shall report to the General Assembly the number of permanent State employees who have been Work First Program recipients during the previous calendar year.

After the State Plan has become law, the Governor shall sign it and cause it to be submitted to federal officials in accordance with federal law.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 2007-323, s. 10.35A(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 10.35A(b), effective July 1, 2007, substituted “odd-numbered” for “even numbered calendar” in the middle of subsection (a).

§ 108A-27.11.
Work First Program funding.

County block grants, except funds for Work First Family Assistance, shall be computed based on the percentage of each county’s total AFDC (including AFDC-EA) and JOBS expenditures, except expenditures for cash assistance, to statewide actual expenditures for those programs in fiscal year 1995-96. The resulting percentage shall be applied to the State’s total certified budget enacted by the General Assembly for each fiscal year, except for State funds budgeted for State and county demonstration projects authorized by the General Assembly and for Work First Family Assistance payments.

The following shall apply to funding for Standard Program Counties:

The Department shall make payments of Work First Family Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance subject to the availability of federal, State, and county funds.

The Department shall reimburse counties for county expenditures under the Work First Program subject to the availability of federal, State, and county funds.

Each Electing County’s allocation for Work First Family Assistance shall be computed based on the percentage of each Electing County’s total expenditures for cash assistance to statewide actual expenditures for cash assistance in 1995-96. The resulting percentage shall be applied to the federal TANF block grant funds appropriated for cash assistance by the General Assembly each fiscal year. The Department shall transmit the federal funds contained in the county block grants to Electing Counties as soon as practicable after they become available to the State and in accordance with federal cash management laws and regulations.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 1998-212, s. 12.27A(i); 1999-359, s. 3; 2002-126, s. 10.37; 2003-284, s. 10.50.

Local Modification.

Beaufort, Caldwell, Catawba, Iredell, Lenoir, Lincoln, Macon, Wilson: 2008-69 (as to hold-harmless provision for electing counties in the 2008-2009 fiscal year).

TANF Benefit Implementation.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9I.2(a)-(e), provides: “(a) The General Assembly approves the plan titled “North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan FY 2019-2022,” prepared by the Department of Health and Human Services and presented to the General Assembly. The North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan covers the period October 1, 2019, through September 30, 2022. The Department shall submit the State Plan, as revised in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, to the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

“(b) The counties approved as Electing Counties in the North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan FY 2019-2022, as approved by this section, are Beaufort, Caldwell, Catawba, Lenoir, Lincoln, Macon, and Wilson.

“(c) Counties that submitted the letter of intent to remain as an Electing County or to be redesignated as an Electing County and the accompanying county plan for years 2019 through 2022, pursuant to G.S. 108A-27(e), shall operate under the Electing County budget requirements effective July 1, 2021. For programmatic purposes, all counties referred to in this subsection shall remain under their current county designation through September 30, 2022.

“(d) For each year of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, Electing Counties shall be held harmless to their Work First Family Assistance allocations for the 2020-2021 fiscal year, provided that remaining funds allocated for Work First Family Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance are sufficient for payments made by the Department on behalf of Standard Counties pursuant to G.S. 108A-27.11(b).

“(e) In the event that departmental projections of Work First Family Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance for the 2021-2022 fiscal year or the 2022-2023 fiscal year indicate that remaining funds are insufficient for Work First Family Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance payments to be made on behalf of Standard Counties, the Department is authorized to deallocate funds, of those allocated to Electing Counties for Work First Family Assistance in excess of the sums set forth in

G.S. 108A-27.11

, up to the requisite amount for payments in Standard Counties. Prior to deallocation, the Department shall obtain approval by the Office of State Budget and Management. If the Department adjusts the allocation set forth in subsection (d) of this section, then a report shall be made to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12C.1(a)-(e); Session Laws 2016-94, s. 12C.5(b)-(f); Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11C.1(a)-(e); and Session Laws 2019-223, s. 3.1.

§ 108A-27.12.
Maintenance of effort.

The Department shall define in the State Plan the services that can be provided with TANF federal funds and with State and county maintenance of effort funds. The Department shall work with counties to allow flexibility in the spending of county, State, and federal funds so as to maximize the use of resources while assuring that federal maintenance of effort requirements are met.

Counties that fail to meet maintenance of effort requirements and that fail to meet the performance indicators for reducing maintenance of effort shall submit a corrective action plan to the Department and shall be subject to

G.S. 108A-27.14

. The Department may reduce block grant allocations to counties that fail to meet maintenance of effort requirements and performance indicators or may use some of the county’s block grant allocation to secure needed services for clients in that county. If a county fails to comply with maintenance of effort requirements, the Director of the Budget may also withhold State funds appropriated to the county pursuant to

G.S. 108A-93

.

The Department shall maintain the State’s maintenance of effort at one hundred percent (100%) of the State certified budget enacted by the General Assembly for programs under this Part during fiscal year 1996-97. At no time shall the Department reduce or reallocate State funds previously obligated or appropriated for Work First or child welfare services.

Each standard county shall maintain funding in Work First, child welfare, and related activities as defined by the Department at one hundred percent (100%) of the county funds budgeted in State Fiscal Year 1996-97 for AFDC Administration, JOBS employment and training, and AFDC Emergency Assistance (cash and services). A county may request to reduce its block grant and maintenance of effort if that county can demonstrate that it is meeting all the needs of its clients, as defined by the Department’s performance indicators, without spending all of the block grant funds. The needs of clients include child protection, employment services, and related supportive services such as child care. The Department may reallocate any State or federal funds released from a county that reduced its maintenance of effort or from counties not spending their block grants. Funds reallocated to counties will require county match.

During the first year a county operates as an Electing County, the county’s maintenance of effort shall be no less than ninety percent (90%) of the amount the county budgeted for programs under this Part during fiscal year 1996-97. If during the first year of operation as Electing the Electing County achieves one hundred percent (100%) of its goals as set forth in its Electing County Plan, then the Electing County may reduce its maintenance of effort to eighty percent (80%) of the amount the county budgeted for programs under this Part during fiscal year 1996-97 for the second year of the Electing County’s operation and for all years thereafter that the county maintains Electing Status.

The Department may realign funds if the realignment will assure that maintenance of effort requirements are met while maximizing federal revenues.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall report quarterly on the extent to which the State and counties are meeting federal maintenance of effort requirements under Temporary Assistance of Needy Families and on any realignment of funds. The Department and the counties shall work together to maximize full achievement of the State and county maintenance of effort. The Department shall make its report to members of the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Human Resources, and the Joint Legislative Public Assistance Committee, and to the Fiscal Research Division.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 1998-212, s. 12.27A(j); 1999-359, s. 4(a), (c).

§ 108A-27.13.
Performance standards.

The Department, in consultation with the county department of social services and county board of commissioners, shall establish outcome and performance measures for all counties, both Electing and Standard. There exist two goals for the Work First Program: to meet or exceed the federal Work Participation rate of fifty percent (50%) for all Work Eligible families and ninety percent (90%) for all two-parent families. The two goals apply to both Standard and Electing Counties. The Department shall establish monitoring mechanisms and reporting requirements to assess progress toward the goals. The well-being of children and economic factors and conditions within the counties, including the increased numbers of persons employed and increased numbers of hours worked by and wages earned by recipients, shall be considered by the Department.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 11, effective August 26, 2009.

All adult recipients of Work First Program assistance are expected to achieve full-time employment, subject to applicable exceptions. Adult recipients of Work First Program assistance shall comply with the provisions and requirements in their MRAs.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6; 2009-489, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 11, effective August 26, 2009, in subsection (a), substituted “shall establish outcome and performance measures for all counties, both Electing and Standard” for “shall establish acceptable levels of performance for Standard Program Counties in meeting Work First expectations, measured by outcome and performance goals contained in the State Plan” at the end of the first sentence and added the present second and third sentences; and deleted subsection (b), which read: “Electing County performance shall be judged upon the county’s ability to attain the outcomes and goals established in that county’s County Plan.”

§ 108A-27.14.
Corrective action.

When any county fails to meet acceptable levels of performance, the Department may take one or more of the following actions to assist the county in meeting its Work First goals:

Notify the county of the deficiencies and add additional monitoring and reporting requirements.

Require the county to develop and submit for approval by the Department a corrective action plan.

If any Standard Program County fails to meet acceptable levels of performance for two consecutive years, or fails to comply with a corrective action plan developed pursuant to this section, the Department may assume control of the county’s Work First Program, appoint an administrator to administer the county’s Work First Program, and exercise the powers assumed to administer the Work First Program either directly or through contract with private or public agencies. County funding shall continue at levels established by the State Plan when the State has assumed control of a county Work First Program. At no time after the State has assumed control of a Work First Program shall a county withdraw funds previously obligated or appropriated to the Work First Program.

If an Electing County fails to achieve its Work First Program goals for two consecutive years, or fails to comply with a corrective action plan developed pursuant to this section, and as a result the federal government imposes a penalty upon the State, then the county shall lose its Electing County status.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6.

§ 108A-27.15.
Assistance not an entitlement; appeals.

Any assistance programs established under this Part, whether administered by the Department or the counties, are not entitlements, and nothing in this Part shall create any property right.

The Standard Work First Program is a program of temporary public assistance for the purpose of an appeal under

G.S. 108A-79

.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.6.

§ 108A-27.16.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-237, s. 6(h), effective July 1, 1999.

§§ 108A-28,
108A-28.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 12.14.

§ 108A-29.
Priority for employment services.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 12, effective August 26, 2009.

Individuals seeking to apply or reapply for Work First Program assistance and who are not exempt from work requirements shall register with the Division of Employment Security for employment services. The point of registration shall be at an office of the Division in the county in which the individual resides or at another location designated in a Memorandum of Understanding between the Division and the local department of social services.

Individuals who are not otherwise exempt shall present verification of registration for Work First Program assistance. Unless exempt, the individual shall not be approved for Work First Program assistance until verification is received. Child-only cases are exempt from this requirement.

Once an individual has registered as required in subsection (c) of this section and upon verification of the registration by the agency or contractor providing the Work First Program assistance, the individual’s eligibility for Work First Program assistance may be evaluated and the application completed. Continued receipt of Work First Program benefits is contingent upon successful participation in employment services in the Mutual Responsibility Agreement, and lack of cooperation and participation in employment services may result in the termination of benefits to the individual.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 12, effective August 26, 2009.

Each county department of social services shall enter into a cooperative agreement with the local Division to operate the Job Search component on behalf of Work First Program registrants. The cooperative agreement shall include a provision for payment to the Division by the county department of social services for the cost of providing those services, not otherwise available to all clients of the Division, described in this subsection as the same are reflected as a component of the County Plan payable from fund allocations in the county block grant. The county department of social services may also enter into a cooperative agreement with the community college system or any other entity to operate the Job Preparedness component. This cooperative agreement shall include a provision for payment to that entity by the county department of social services for the cost of providing those services, not otherwise available to all clients of the Division, described in this subsection as the same are reflected as a component of the County Plan payable from fund allocations in the county block grant.

The Division shall further assist registrants through job search, job placement, or referral to community service, if contracted to do so.

An individual placed in the Job Search component of the Division or other agency providing Job Search services shall look for work and shall accept any suitable employment. If contracted, the Division shall refer individuals to current job openings and shall make job development contacts for individuals. Individuals so referred shall be required to keep a record of their job search activities on a job search record form provided by the Division, and the Division will monitor these activities. A “job search record” means a written list of dates, times, places, addresses, telephone numbers, names, and circumstances of job interviews. The Job Search component shall include at least one weekly contact with the Division. The Division shall adopt rules to accomplish this subsection.

The Division of Employment Security shall notify all employers in the State of the “Exclusive No-Fault” Referral Service available through the Division of Employment Security to employers who hire personnel through Job Service referrals.

All individuals referred to jobs through the Division of Employment Security shall be instructed in the procedures for applying for the Federal Earned Income Credit (FEIC). All individuals referred to jobs through the Division who qualify for the FEIC shall apply for the FEIC by filing a W-5 form with their employers.

The FEIC shall not be counted as income when eligibility is determined for Work First Program assistance, Medicaid, food and nutrition services, public housing, or Supplemental Security Income.

The Division of Employment Security shall work with the Department of Labor to develop a relationship with these private employment agencies to utilize their services and make referrals of individuals registered with the Division of Employment Security.

An individual who has not found a job within 12 weeks of being placed in the Job Search component of the Program may also be placed in the Community Service component at the county’s option.

If after evaluation of an individual the Division of Employment Security believes it necessary, the Division or the county department of social services also may refer an individual to a Job Preparedness provider. The local community college should include adult high school equivalency diploma, Adult Basic Education, or Human Resources Development programs that are already in existence as a part of the Job Preparedness component. Additionally, the Division or the county department of social services may refer an individual to a literacy council. Through a Memorandum of Understanding between the Division of Employment Security, the local department of social services, and other contracted entities, a system shall be established to monitor an individual’s progress through close communications with the agencies assisting the individual. The Division of Employment Security or Job Preparedness provider shall adopt rules to accomplish this subsection.

The Job Preparedness component of the Program shall last a maximum of 12 weeks unless the recipient is registered and is satisfactorily progressing in a program that requires additional time to complete. Every reasonable effort shall be made to place the recipient in part-time employment or part-time community service if the time required exceeds the 12-week maximum. The county department of social services may contract with service providers to provide the services described in this section and shall monitor the provision of the services by the service providers. Registrants may participate in more than one component at a time.

The Division shall expand its Labor Market Information System. The expansion shall at least include: statistical information on unemployment rates and other labor trends by county; and publications dealing with licensing requirements, economic development, and career projections, and information technology systems which can be used to track participants through the employment and training process.

, (r) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-489, s. 12, effective August 26, 2009.

(s)

Members of families with dependent children and with aggregate family income at or below the level required for eligibility for Work First Family Assistance, regardless of whether or not they have applied for such assistance, shall be given priority in obtaining employment services including training and community service provided by or through State agencies or counties or with funds which are allocated to the State of North Carolina directly or indirectly through prime sponsors or otherwise for the purpose of employment of unemployed persons.

History.

1961, c. 998; 1963, c. 1061; 1965, c. 939, s. 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1971, c. 283; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1977, c. 362; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1282, s. 19; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 966, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 12.7(a); 1998-212, s. 12.27A(l), (m); 1999-340, s. 9; 2001-424, s. 21.13(d), (e); 2007-97, s. 8; 2009-489, s. 12; 2011-401, s. 3.12; 2014-115, s. 28(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-97, s. 8, effective June 20, 2007, substituted “food and nutrition services” for “food stamps, subsidies” in subsection (k).

Session Laws 2009-489, s. 12, effective August 26, 2009, rewrote the section heading; deleted subsection (a) pertaining to the establishment and administration of the First Stop Employment Assistance program; substituted “the Employment Security Commission for employment services” for “the First Stop Employment Assistance Program” at the end of the first sentence in subsection (b); deleted “at the time of applying” following “registration” in the first sentence of subsection (c); substituted “the employment services in the Mutual Responsibility Agreement, and lack of cooperation and participation in employment services” for “the First Stop Employment Program, and lack of cooperation and participation in the First Stop Employment Program” in subsection (d); deleted subsection (e), which read: “The county board of commissioners shall determine which agencies or nonprofit or private contractors will participate with the Employment Security Commission and the local department of social services in developing the rules to implement the First Stop Employment Program.”; in subsection (f), deleted the former first sentence, which read: “At the county’s option, the Employment Security Commission, in consultation with and with the assistance of the agencies specified in the Memorandum of Understanding described in subsection (b) of this section, shall provide to Work First Program registrants the continuum of services available through its Employment Security Commission.”, and, in the present first sentence, substituted “Each county department of social services shall” for “Each County Plan may provide that the county department of social services enter” and inserted “local”; deleted the former first sentence in subsection (g), which read: “The Employment Security Commission shall be the primary job placement entity of the Work First Program.”; substituted “Employment Security Commission or other agency providing Job Search services” for “First Stop Employment Program” in the first sentence of subsection (h); substituted “a Job Preparedness provider” for “the Job Preparedness component of the First Stop Employment Program” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (n); and deleted subsections (q) and (r) pertaining to a Job Service Employer Committee and “NC WORKS” studies.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 3.12, effective November 1, 2011, throughout the section, substituted “Division of Employment Security” and “Division” for “Employment Security Commission.”

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 28(d), effective August 11, 2014, substituted “adult high school equivalency diploma” for “General Education Development” in the second sentence of subsection (n).

Legal Periodicals.

For note on illegitimacy in North Carolina, see 46 N.C.L. Rev. 813 (1968).

For note on the “man in the house” or “substitute parent” rule in determining eligibility for aid to dependent children, see 47 N.C.L. Rev. 228 (1968).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

As to eligibility of children for aid to families with dependent children although parent does not qualify

as a payee, see opinion of Attorney General to Colonel Clifton M. Craig, Commissioner, Department of Social Services, 40 N.C.A.G. 652 (1970), issued under former Chapter 108.

§ 108A-29.1.
Drug screening and testing for Work First Program applicants and recipients.

The Department shall require a drug test to screen each applicant for or recipient of Work First Program assistance whom the Department reasonably suspects is engaged in the illegal use of controlled substances. The Department shall provide notice of drug testing to each applicant or recipient. The notice shall advise the applicant or recipient that drug screening, and testing if there is reasonable suspicion that an individual is engaged in the illegal use of controlled substances, will be conducted as a condition of receiving Work First Program assistance, and that the results of the drug tests will remain confidential and will not be released to law enforcement. Dependent children under the age of 18 are exempt from the requirements of this section. The Department shall require the following:

That for two-parent households, both parents comply with the requirements of this section.

That any teen parent who is emancipated pursuant to Article 35 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes complies with the requirements of this section.

That each applicant or recipient be advised before drug testing that he or she may inform the agent administering the test of any prescription or over-the-counter medication he or she is taking.

That each applicant or recipient being tested signs a written acknowledgement that he or she has received and understood the notice and advice provided under this subsection.

That each applicant or recipient who fails a drug test understands that he or she has the right to take one or more additional tests at his or her own expense.

That each applicant or recipient who fails a drug test be provided with information regarding substance abuse, substance abuse counseling, and substance abuse treatment options, including a list of substance abuse treatment programs that may be available to the individual.

An applicant or recipient who tests positive for controlled substances as a result of a drug test required under this section is ineligible to receive Work First Program assistance for one year from the date of the positive drug test except as provided in subsections (b1) and (b2) of this section. The individual may reapply after one year. However, if the individual has any subsequent positive drug tests, the individual shall be ineligible for benefits for three years from the date of the subsequent positive drug test unless the individual reapplies pursuant to subsection (b1) or (b2) of this section.

(b1)

An applicant or recipient deemed ineligible under subsection (b) of this section may reapply for Work First Program assistance after the expiration of 30 days from the date of the positive drug test if the individual can document either the successful completion of or the current satisfactory participation in a substance abuse treatment program offered by a provider under subsection (e) of this section and licensed by the Department. The applicant or recipient who reapplies for Work First Program assistance after successful completion of a substance abuse program shall pass a drug test. The cost of any drug testing and substance abuse program provided under this subsection shall be the responsibility of the individual being tested and receiving treatment. An applicant or recipient who reapplies for Work First Program assistance pursuant to this subsection may reapply one time only.

(b2)

An applicant or recipient deemed ineligible under subsection (b) of this section may reapply for Work First Program assistance after the expiration of 30 days from the date of the positive drug test if a qualified professional in substance abuse or a physician certified by the American Society of Addiction Medicine determines a substance abuse program is not appropriate for the individual and that individual has passed a subsequent drug test. The cost of any drug testing provided under this subsection shall be the responsibility of the individual being tested. An applicant or recipient who reapplies for Work First Program assistance pursuant to this subsection may reapply one time only.

The children of any applicant or current recipient shall remain eligible for benefits, and these benefits shall be paid to a protective payee pursuant to

G.S. 108A-38

.

The Social Services Commission shall adopt rules pertaining to the testing of applicants and recipients under this section. The Social Services Commission shall adopt rules pertaining to the successful completion of, or the satisfactory participation in, a substance abuse treatment program under subsection (b1) of this section, including rules regarding timely reporting of completion of or participation in the substance abuse treatment programs.

Area mental health authorities organized pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes shall be responsible for administering the provisions of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-417, s. 4, as amended by Session Laws 2014-115, s. 66 (c), effective March 1, 2015.

For the purposes of this section, reasonable suspicion that an applicant for, or recipient of, Work First Program assistance is engaged in the illegal use of controlled substances may be established only by utilizing the following methods:

A criminal record check conducted under G.S. 114-19.34 that discloses a conviction, arrest, or outstanding warrant relating to illegal controlled substances within the three years prior to the date the criminal record check is conducted.

A determination by a qualified professional in substance abuse or a physician certified by the American Society of Addiction Medicine that an individual is addicted to illegal controlled substances.

A screening tool relating to the abuse of illegal controlled substances that yields a result indicating that the applicant or recipient may be engaged in the illegal use of controlled substances.

Other screening methods, as determined by the Social Services Commission under subsection (d) of this section.

Child only cases shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

History.

1997-443, s. 12.8; 2009-489, s. 13; 2013-417, s. 4; 2014-115, s. 66(c).

§ 108A-30.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 12.14.